Utah statutes.
51-7-9.5.   State School Fund report.

(1)  The state treasurer shall prepare a report at the end of each fiscal year on the State School Fund created in Utah Constitution Article X, Section 5.

(2)  The report shall include the following information:

(a)  the name of each asset within the fund and the fair market value of each asset as of June 30;

(b)  the amount and date of each contribution to the fund during the fiscal year;

(c)  a balance sheet for the most recently completed fiscal year and the previous fiscal year;

(d)  the fund's internal rate of return for the previous year, three years, and five years;

(e)  a summary of the asset allocation policy for the fund;

(f)  a description of the fund income, including amounts distributed and amounts retained; and

(g)  expenses in dollars and as a percent of fund assets.

(3)  The state treasurer shall submit the report to the Education Interim Committee by October 1 of each year.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2002 General Session

